src/morphology/affixes/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON ACRO_OO
!! Acronyms that end in 'h', 'k' or 'o' that is pronounced as a letter:
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms O
!!€ HK: HK+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ HK:n: HK+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ HK:lla: HK+N+Sg+Ade
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:ta    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hon   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_UU
!! Acronyms that end in 'q', or 'u' pronounced as a letter:
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms U
!!€ EU: EU+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ EU:t: EU+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ EU:hun: EU+N+Sg+Ill
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:ta    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hun   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_ÄKS
!! Acronym that ends in 'f', 'l', 'm', 'n', 'r', 's', 'š' or 'x' pronounced as
!! a letter:
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms X
!!€ GPRS: GPRS+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ GPRS:llä: GPRS+N+Sg+Ade
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:ää    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:ään   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>ä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>in   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_YY
!! Acronym that ends in 'y' pronounced as letter
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms Y
!!€ EY: EY+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ EY:hyn: EY+N+Sg+Ill
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hyn   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>tä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_ZET
!! Acronyms that end in 'z' pronounced as letter
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms Z
!!€ Z: Z+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ Z:t: Z+N+Pl+Nom
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:aa    ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:aan   ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:tta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:lta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:lla   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:sta   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:na    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssa   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:ja    ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>tta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>lta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>lla  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>na   ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>sta  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssa  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_ÄÄ
!! Acronyms that end in 'ä' pronounced as letter
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms Ä
!!€ Ä: Ä+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ Ä:t: Ä+N+Pl+Nom
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hän   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>tä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;

LEXICON ACRO_ÖÖ
!! Acronyms that end in 'ö' pronounced as letter
!!€gt-norm: Acronyms Ö
!!€ Ö: Ö+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ Ö:t: Ö+N+Pl+Nom
0  ACRO_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%>%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%>%:t ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%>%:n ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%>%:tä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%>%:hön   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%>%:ttä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%>%:ltä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%>%:llä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%>%:lle   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%>%:stä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%>%:nä    ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%>%:ssä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:ksi   ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%>%:kse   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%>%:i%>tä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%>%:i%>hin  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%>%:i%>ttä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%>%:i%>ltä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%>%:i%>llä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%>%:i%>lle  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%>%:i%>nä   ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%>%:i%>ne  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%>%:i%>stä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%>%:i%>ssä  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%>%:i%>n    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>ksi  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%>%:i%>kse  ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;


! possessives
LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS
+PxSg1:%>ni  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsä ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsä ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS
+PxSg1:%>ni  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg2:%>si  ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxSg3:%>nsa ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl1:%>mme ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl2:%>nne ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;
+PxPl3:%>nsa ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT        ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN
+PxSg3:%>an    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>an    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_POSS_EN
+PxSg3:%>en    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ACRO_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_EN
+PxSg3:%>en    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>en    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ACRO_FRONT_POSS_ÄN
+PxSg3:%>än    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
+PxPl3:%>än    ACRO_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON ACRO_BACK_CLIT
+Foc/han:%>han   #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/kaan:%>han%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/han+Qst:%>ha%>nko #        ;
+Foc/han+Foc/pa:%>han%>pa #        ;
+Qst:%>ko #        ;
+Qst+Foc/han:%>ko%>han #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kaan:%>ko%>kaan    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/kin:%>ko%>kin    #        ;
+Qst+Foc/pa:%>ko%>pa   #        ;
+Qst+Foc/s:%>ko%>s    #        ;
+Foc/pa:%>pa #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/han:%>pa%>han #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kaan:%>pa%>kaan    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/kin:%>pa%>kin    #        ;
+Foc/pa+Qst:%>pa%>ko   #        ;
+Foc/pa+Foc/s:%>pa%>s    #        ;
+Foc/kin:%>kin  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/han:%>kin%>han  #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/kaan:%>kin%>kaan #        ;
+Foc/kin+Qst:%>kin%>ko    #        ;
+Foc/kin+Foc/pa:%>kin%>pa    #        ;
+Foc/kaan:%>kaan  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/han:%>kaan%>han  #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/kin:%>kaan%>kin #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Qst:%>kaan%>ko    #        ;
+Foc/kaan+Foc/pa:%>kaan%>pa    #        ;
